Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.160

Penalty for act constituting a crime under state law—Limitation.

Except as limited by the maximum penalty authorized by law, no county may establish a penalty for an act that constitutes a crime under state law that is different from the penalty prescribed for that crime by state statute.

[ 1993 c 83 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 83: See note following RCW 35.21.163.